Hawaii statutes.
§507-23 Sale of personal property by lien
holder. Notwithstanding sections 507-18 to 507-22, in the event the
reasonable charges for the work done and materials furnished do not exceed
$150, the holder of any lien provided for in section 507-18 may, in lieu of
obtaining judgment and execution upon the property so held by the holder, sell
the article of personal property upon which the alterations or repairs have
been made in the manner hereinafter set forth and apply the proceeds of the
sale in satisfaction of the reasonable charges for the work done and materials
furnished; provided that the article has been unclaimed for at least three
months. The holder of the lien shall give public notice by publication in a
newspaper of general circulation in the State, the publication to be not less
than ten days prior to the date of sale, and shall notify the owner of the sale
by sending a letter by registered mail to the last known address of the owner
at least thirty days prior to the sale. The notice shall particularly describe
the article to be sold, the name of the owner, the date and place of the sale,
and the amount of the reasonable charges. At the time and place so published,
the article may be sold and the purchaser shall succeed to the title of the owner.
Out of the proceeds of the sale the holder of the lien may retain the amount of
the reasonable charges, the cost of publication and other expenses incident to
the sale. Any balance remaining unclaimed by the owner of the article within
thirty days from the date of the sale shall be deposited with the director of
finance and shall be payable to the owner of the article if claimed within one
year from the date of the sale. If no claim is made for the balance within
that period, the moneys so deposited shall become a government realization. [L
1957, c 311, §1; am L 1959, c 204, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c
114, §1; Supp, §193-26; HRS §507-23; am L 1972, c 85, §1; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Mailing, see §1-28.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next